Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 1 Administration of Estate

53-9-1.
Presumption or proof of death; presumption that missing person predeceased other deceased individual; perils or tragedies resulting in probable death.

A domiciliary of this state who has been missing from the last known place of domicile for a continuous period of four years shall be presumed to have died; provided, however, that such presumption of death may be rebutted by proof. The date of death is presumed to be the end of the four-year period unless it is proved by a preponderance of the evidence that death occurred earlier.

When any domiciliary of this state has been missing from the last known place of domicile for a continuous period of 12 months or more, the death of the individual may be proved by a preponderance of the evidence.

Notwithstanding any proof of a date of death that is earlier than the end of the four-year period set out in subsection (a) of this Code section, the missing individual shall be deemed to have predeceased any other individual who has died prior to the date any petition for letters or other action on the missing individual’s estate is filed and from whom the missing individual would have taken an interest in property as an heir or beneficiary or otherwise.

When any domiciliary of this state has been exposed to a specific peril or tragedy resulting in probable death, the death of the individual may be proved by clear and convincing evidence at any time after such exposure.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2003, p. 332, § 1.

Cross references.

Presumptions, §

24-14-20

et seq.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

53-9-2.
Filing and contents of petition; publication of citation.

A petition for administration of the estate, for the probate in common form or solemn form of the will, for year’s support, or for an order that no administration is necessary may be filed for the estate of a missing individual whose death may be presumed or established in the probate court as provided in Code Section 53-9-1. The petition may be made by anyone who would be entitled to file such petition on the estate of the missing individual if the missing individual were known to be dead and shall be filed in the county in which the estate of the missing individual would be administered were the missing individual known to be dead.

In addition to complying with all of the requirements for petitions pertaining to the administration of an estate or the probate of a will or year’s support or an order that no administration is necessary, as appropriate, the petition regarding the estate of a missing individual who is believed to be dead shall set forth the circumstances under which the individual disappeared, what inquiry has been made as to the individual’s whereabouts, and such evidence as shall be offered, if necessary, for the purpose of proving death by a preponderance of the evidence.

If the court finds the petition to be in compliance with the requirements set forth in subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall issue an order directing that a citation issue and be published once a week for four weeks in the official newspaper of the county in which the petition is made giving notice that on a date certain, which shall be at least 90 days after the first publication of such citation, evidence will be heard by the court concerning the alleged absence of the individual presumed to be dead and the circumstances and duration of such absence and requiring the missing individual, if alive, or any other person to produce and present to the court evidence that the missing individual is still in life. The publication of citation required by this subsection may be combined with any other service of notice required for the issuance of letters testamentary or letters of administration, an order for year’s support, or an order that no administration is necessary or directed by the court pursuant to Code Section 53-11-5. Such service of notice shall be made as provided in Chapter 11 of this title on all individuals who would be heirs if the missing individual were known to be dead. The order may also direct that the petitioner make a search for the missing individual and shall specify the manner in which the search is to be conducted to ensure that, in light of the circumstances of the particular case, a diligent and reasonable effort has been made to locate the missing individual. The order may prescribe any methods of search deemed by the judge to be adequate and appropriate, including but not limited to publishing notices in newspapers in appropriate locations and making inquiry of governmental agencies and of the missing individual’s relatives and friends and at the missing individual’s last place of abode or other appropriate places.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-60/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (c), in the first sentence, substituted “citation issue and” for “notice”, inserted “in the official newspaper of the county in which the petition is made”, substituted “date certain” for “day stated”, and substituted “such citation” for “the notice”; in the second sentence, substituted “publication of citation” for “notice”, inserted “service of”, substituted “testamentary or letters of administration,” for “or”, and added “or directed by the court pursuant to Code Section 53-11-5” at the end; and in the third sentence, substituted “Such service of” for “The” and substituted “made” for “served”.

53-9-3.
Hearing; finding of death.

At the hearing the probate court shall hear such evidence as shall be offered for the purpose of ascertaining whether a diligent and reasonable effort has been made to locate the missing individual and, if appropriate, such evidence that is offered to show that the missing individual is dead or alive. No person shall be disqualified from testifying by reason of being the spouse of the missing individual or having an interest in the estate of the missing individual. If the court finds that a diligent and reasonable effort has been made to locate the missing individual and that a presumption of death has been established and has not been rebutted as provided under subsection (a) of Code Section 53-9-1 or that death has been proved by a preponderance of the evidence as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 53-9-1, the court shall enter an order finding that the missing individual is dead and specifying the date of death.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-4.
Issuance of letters or order.

At any time after the entering of the order finding the missing individual to be dead, the probate court shall issue letters of administration or letters testamentary or an order granting year’s support or an order that no administration is necessary in conformity with all of the requirements of the appropriate laws of this state on the estate of the missing individual and such letters or order, unless revoked, and all acts done in pursuance thereof and in reliance on such letters or order shall be as valid as if the missing individual were known to be dead.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-5.
Revocation of letters upon proof that missing individual is alive.

Upon petition of the missing individual, the probate court shall revoke the letters of administration or letters testamentary at any time on due and satisfactory proof that the missing individual is in fact alive. After such revocation, all the powers of the personal representative shall cease, but all receipts or disbursements of assets or other acts previously done by the personal representative shall remain valid, and the personal representative shall settle and account for the administration to the time of such revocation and shall transfer all assets remaining to the missing individual or such individual’s duly authorized agent or attorney.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-6.
Recovery of property by missing individual.

At any time before the expiration of two years after letters or an order for year’s support or an order that no administration is necessary is issued regarding the estate of the missing individual, any property received by any spouse or child or other purported heir or beneficiary of the missing individual may be recovered by the missing individual unless the property has been transferred for an adequate consideration to a bona fide purchaser, in which case the amount of the consideration received for such transfer may be recovered from the transferor. No action to recover any property from any spouse, child, or other purported heir or beneficiary or to recover any consideration received by such a person as a result of a transfer of property to a bona fide purchaser may be brought by a missing individual after the expiration of the two-year period set out in this Code section unless the missing individual is a minor, in which case the time for bringing such actions shall be extended to two years from the date the missing individual reaches the age of majority.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-7.
Distribution of assets.

Before a distribution of any of the assets of the estate of a missing person is made to a spouse, child, or other purported heir or beneficiary within the two-year period set out in Code Section 53-9-6, such spouse, child, or other purported heir or beneficiary shall give security, to be approved by the probate court in such sum as the court shall direct but in no case less than the estimated value of the money or property distributed, conditioned that if the missing individual is in fact alive, the person giving security will deliver to the missing individual, on demand by such individual at any time within the two-year period, the assets received by the person giving such security or, if such assets have been transferred to a bona fide purchaser, the consideration received in such transfer, without interest. If any person entitled to receive such assets is unable to give security, the personal representative shall continue to hold such assets until:

Security is given;

The court orders the personal representative to deliver the assets to the person; or

The two-year period has expired,

whichever occurs first, and in the meantime shall invest the assets in any investment that is authorized by law for personal representatives or that is authorized in the duly probated will of the missing individual and shall pay the income from such investments to the person or persons entitled to such assets quarterly or as otherwise directed by the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-8.
Probate court judges allowed to hold certain funds for missing heir or beneficiary under decedent’s will.

The judges of the probate court, in their discretion, shall also be the depositories for and custodians of all moneys of any heir or beneficiary of any estate who cannot be located by the personal representative for moneys that may be distributed to the heir or beneficiary. Any personal representative shall be authorized to pay over to the judge any such moneys; and the judge shall be authorized to take charge thereof as provided for in this Code section.

The judge shall turn over to the Department of Revenue all custodial property held pursuant to this Code section 15 years after receipt by the judge of such property.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 22/SB 534.